Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.510

Rendering professional services.

(1) A person or group of persons licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services, as defined in RCW 18.100.030, within this state may organize and become a member or members of a limited liability partnership under the provisions of this chapter for the purposes of rendering professional service. Nothing in this section prohibits a person duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services in any jurisdiction other than this state from becoming a member of a limited liability partnership organized for the purpose of rendering the same professional services. Nothing in this section prohibits a limited liability partnership from rendering professional services outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state.

(2)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed or certified pursuant to chapters 18.06, 18.225, 18.22, 18.25, 18.29, 18.34, 18.35, 18.36A, 18.50, 18.53, 18.55, 18.64, 18.79, 18.83, 18.89, 18.108, and 18.138 RCW may join and render their individual professional services through one limited liability partnership and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a limited liability partnership, as rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same professional services" or similar terms.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, health care professionals who are licensed pursuant to chapters 18.57 and 18.71 RCW may join and render their individual professional services through one limited liability partnership and are to be considered, for the purpose of forming a limited liability partnership, as rendering the "same specific professional services" or "same professional services" or similar terms.

(c) Formation of a limited liability partnership under this subsection does not restrict the application of the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, or any applicable health care professional statutes under Title 18 RCW, including but not limited to restrictions on persons practicing a health profession without being appropriately credentialed and persons practicing beyond the scope of their credential.

[ 2001 c 251 s 31; 1998 c 103 s 1103.]

NOTES:

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.